<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR89111-0076 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.1-11-89.f2.A1075</DOCID><TEXT><ITAG tagnum="52">NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Operating LicensesInvolving No Significant Hazards Considerations</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background</ITAG>Pursuant to Public Law (P.L.) 97-415, the Nuclear Regulatory Commission(the Commission) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. P.L. 97-415revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, orproposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act.This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediatelyeffective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination bythe Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration,notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearingfrom any person.This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposedto be issued from December 16, 1988 through December 29, 1986. The lastbiweekly notice was published on December 30, 1988 (53 FR 53086).<ITAG tagnum="85">NOTICE OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATINGLICENSE AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATION DETERMINATIONAND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING</ITAG>The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendmentrequests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission'sregulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facilityin accordance with the proposed amendments would not (1) involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for eachamendment request is shown below.The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination.Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of thisnotice will be considered in making any final determination. The Commissionwill not normally make a final determination unless it receives a requestfor a hearing.Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Regulatory PublicationsBranch, Division of Freedom of Information and Publications Services, Officeof Administration and Resources Management, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, D.C. 20555, and should cite the publication date and page numberof this <T4>Federal Register </T4>notice. Written comments may also be deliveredto Room P-216, Phillips Building, 7920 Norfolk Avenue, Bethesda, Marylandfrom 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Copies of written comments received may beexamined at the NRC Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street,NW, Washington, D.C. The filing of requests for hearing and petitions forleave to intervene is discussed below.By February 10, 1989, the licensee may file a request for a hearing withrespect to issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operatinglicense and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceedingand who wishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file awritten petition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and petitionsfor leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part2. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filedby the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board,designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety andLicensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition and theSecretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issuea notice of hearing or an appropriate order.As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall setforth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding,and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding.The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention shouldbe permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) thenature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to theproceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial,or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of anyorder which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest.The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subjectmatter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Anyperson who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has beenadmitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave ofthe Board up to fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfythe specificity requirements described above.Not later than fifteen (15) days prior to the first prehearing conferencescheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to thepetition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions whichare sought to be litigated in the matter, and the bases for each contentionset forth with reasonable specificity. Contentions shall be limited tomatters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. A petitionerwho fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirementswith respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participateas a party.Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subjectto any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have theopportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, includingthe opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses.If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determinationon the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determinationwill serve to decide when the hearing is held.If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significanthazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and makeit immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Anyhearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment.If the final determination is that the amendment involves a significanthazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuanceof any amendment. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expirationof the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change duringthe notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result,for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission mayissue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day noticeperiod, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involvesno significant hazards consideration. The final determination will considerall public and State comments received before action is taken. Should theCommission take this action, it will publish a notice of issuance and providefor opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects thatthe need to take this action will occur very infrequently. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filedwith the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Service Branch, or may bedelivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building,2120 L Street, N.W., Washington, D.C., by the above date. Where petitionsare filed during the last ten (10) days of the notice period, it is requestedthat the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephonecall to Western Union at 1-(800) 325-6000 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700).The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number3737 and the following message addressed to (<T3>Project Director</T3>): petitioner's name and telephone number; datepetition was mailed; plant name; and publication date and page number ofthis <T4>Federal Register</T4> notice. A copy of the petition should also besent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission,Washington, D.C. 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions,supplemental petitions and/or requests for hearing will not be entertainedabsent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or thepresiding Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, that the petition and/or requestshould be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application foramendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission'sPublic Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, N.W., Washington,D.C., and at the local public document room for the particular facilityinvolved. <ITAG tagnum="85">Alabama Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-348 and 50-364, Joseph M. FarleyNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Houston County, Alabama </ITAG><T3>Date of amendments request: </T3>December 14, 1988 <T3>Description of amendments request: </T3>The proposed amendment willadd Technical Specifications for the reactor vessel level indicating system(RVLIS) which has been installed per Generic Letter (GL) 82-28 and NUREG-0737,Item II.F.2. In addition, an editorial change is made for Unit 1 to removea one time change approved by Amendment No. 34. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a nosignificant hazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c).A proposed amendment to an operating license involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee's findings regarding the RVLIS change are summarized below:1. The proposed change will not increase the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The RVLIS is neither credited norrequired for the mitigation of any previously evaluated accident, and isnot relied upon for reactor trip or initiation of any plant safety system.Therefore, the proposed change does not affect the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed change will not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The proposed changeis intended solely to enhance the ability of the operator to manage accidentsand transients by providing the operator with additional corroborativeinformation. 3. The proposed change will not involve a reduction in a margin of safety.The components installed within the reactor vessel were designed and fabricatedto produce the same flow effect as the control rod drive mechanism guidetubes which they replaced. Existing technical specifications provide assurancethat the minimum thermal design flow is maintained. The specific purposeof the proposed amendment is to enhance accident and transient monitoringcapabilities and thus increase the margin of safety. If four of the eightsensors are functioning, the operator can determine if a void has formed,if it is growing, or if the corrective action is succeeding in reducingthe void. These requirement are considered adequate to track the courseof an accident. Based on the above reasoning, the license has determined that the proposedchange involves no significant hazards consideration. The NRC staff hasreviewed the licensee's no significant hazards consideration determinationand agrees with the licensee's analysis. In addition, the Commission guidance(51 FR 7751) notes certain examples of amendments that are not likely toinvolve a significant hazards consideration. One example is ``(ii) A changethat constitutes an additional limitation, restriction, or control notpresently included in the technical specifications, e.g., a more stringentsurveillance requirement.'' The proposed change concerning the RVLIS fitsthis example. Concerning the editorial change to the Unit 1 Technical Specifications,example (i), ``A purely administrative change: for example, a change toachieve consistency throughout the technical specifications, correctionof an error, or a change in nomenclature'' applies. Accordingly, the Commissionproposes to determine that the requested amendment does not involve a significanthazards consideration. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Houston_Love Memorial Library,212 W. Burdeshaw Street, Dothan, Alabama 36303. <T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Ernest L. Blake, Esquire, 2300 N Street,NW, Washington, DC 20037. <T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Elinor G. Adensam. <ITAG tagnum="85">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-325 and50-324, Brunswick Steam Electric Plant, Units 1 and 2, Brunswick County,North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>October 28, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (TS) for Brunswick Steam Electric Plant,Units 1 and 2 by modifying footnote * * *, in Table 1.2, entitled ``OperationalConditions'' on page 1-10 for Unit 1 and page 1-11 for Unit 2. The revisedfootnote would allow the reactor mode switch to be placed in the Refuelposition while a single control rod is being moved, as opposed to onlywhen being recoupled, provided the one-rod-out interlock is operable. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazard consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether no significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no significant hazards consideration ifoperation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment wouldnot: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of anew or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company (CPandamp;L) has reviewed the proposed changesto TS Table 1.2 and has determined that the requested amendment does notinvolve a significant hazards consideration for the following reasons:1. Revising Footnote * * * to more clearly allow movement as opposed torecoupling of a single control rod does not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.The Brunswick Technical Specifications currently allow, while in OperationalConditions 3 (Hot Shutdown) or 4 (Cold Shutdown), the reactor mode switchto be placed in the Refuel position from the Shutdown position while asingle control rod is being recoupled provided that the one-rod-out interlockis operable (Footnote * * * to Table 1.2). The proposed change will allowthe operator to move a control rod for testing or recoupling while theunit is in either Operational Condition 3 or 4. This will be in additionto control rod testing already permitted by the Brunswick Technical Specificationsin Operational Conditions 2 (Startup) and 5 (Refueling).When the mode switch is in the Refuel position, criticality cannot be achieved,even with one control rod completely removed from the core. Currently,only a single control rod may be removed from the core at any given timewhile the mode switch is in the Refuel position. This maintains the shutdownmargin of the plant and enforces the shutdown margin electronically. Theproposed change will not impact these mechanisms, and the same shutdownmargin will be maintained. Thus, the probability of an accident will notbe significantly changed. Control rod recoupling involves moving the control rod from full-in tofull-out and vice-versa. Control rod testing involves recording the timeit takes for the control rod to be withdrawn from full-in to full-out andfrom full-out to full-in. Thus, the movement involved in recoupling a rodbounds the movement involved in control rod testing. Therefore, the consequencesof any accident that could occur during control rod testing would be boundedby those that could occur during recoupling. Thus, the consequences ofan accident will not be changed.2. The Brunswick Technical Specifications currently allow, while in OperationalConditions 3 or 4, the reactor mode switch to be placed in the Refuel positionfrom the Shutdown position while a single control rod is being recoupledprovided that the one-rod-out interlock is operable (Footnote * * * toTable 1.2). Movement of a control rod through the recoupling process encompassesany possible position the control rod can be placed in when being moved.In addition, when the mode switch is in the Refuel position, criticalitycannot be achieved, even with one control rod completely removed from thecore. Currently, only a single control rod may be removed from the coreat any given time while the mode switch is in the Refuel position. Thismaintains the shutdown margin of the plant and enforces the shutdown marginelectronically.The proposed change will not impact the existing plant protective systemand the same shutdown margin will be maintained. No modifications are beingmade that will decrease the shutdown margin or jeopardize the safety functionsof the protection system. Thus, the proposed amendment does not createthe possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accidentpreviously evaluated.3. The proposed change will not impact the existing plant protective systemand the same shutdown margin will be maintained. When the mode switch isin the Refuel position, criticality cannot be achieved, even with one controlrod completely removed from the core. Currently, only a single controlrod may be removed from the core at any given time while the mode switchis in the Refuel position. This maintains the shutdown margin of the plantand enforces the shutdown margin electronically. No modifications are beingmade that will decrease the shutdown margin or jeopardize the safety functionsof the protective system. Thus, the proposed amendment does not involvea significant reduction in the margin of safety.The staff has reviewed the CPandamp;L determinations and is in agreementwith them. Accordingly, the Commission proposes to determine that thesechanges do not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3298.<T3>Attorney for licensee:</T3> R. E. Jones, General Counsel, CarolinaPower andamp; Light Company, P.O. Box 1551, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602.<T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> Elinor G. Adensam.<ITAG tagnum="85">Carolina Power and Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-400, ShearonHarris Nuclear Power Plant (SHNPP), Wake and Chatham Counties, North Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of Amendments Request:</T3> November 9, 1987<T3>Description of Amendments Request:</T3> The purpose of the proposedamendment is to change the general limiting conditions for operation (LCO)and general surveillance requirements (SR) of the Technical Specifications(TS) for SHNPP, TS 3.0.4, 4.0.3 and 4.0.4, and the Bases Sections associatedwith Sections 3.0 and 4.0, as well as to modify numerous other TS sectionsto conform to the revised general LCO and general SR. The proposed changesare in response to the Commission's Generic Letter (GL) 87-09, ``Sections3.0 and 4.0 of the Standard Technical Specifications (STS) on the Applicabilityof Limiting Conditions for Operation and Surveillance Requirements,'' issuedJune 4, 1987.Currently, TS 3.0.4 does not allow entry into an OPERATIONAL CONDITIONunless the conditions of the specific LCO are met without reliance on provisionscontained in the ACTION statements. This unduly restricts facility operationwhen conformance to the ACTION requirements provides an acceptable levelof safety for continued operation. The proposed revision to TS 3.0.4 wouldallow entry into an OPERATIONAL CONDITION in accordance with ACTION requirementswhen conformance to the ACTION requirements provides an acceptable levelof safety for continued operation of the facility for an unlimited periodof time. This is consistent with the guidance provided in GL 87-09. Inorder to prevent operator confusion, individual exceptions to TS 3.0.4are to be deleted where appropriate.Currently, TS 4.0.3 states that performance of an SR within the specifiedtime interval shall constitute compliance with the OPERABILITY requirementsfor an LCO and associated ACTION statements. If an SR is not met as a resultof failure to perform the scheduled surveillance, the LCO would not bemet and the associated ACTION requirements must be entered. If the missedsurveillance cannot be successfully performed during the time intervalspecified, a plant shutdown is usually required. It is considered overlyconservative to assume that a system or component is inoperable when anSR has not been performed. The proposed revision to TS 4.0.3 provides adelay of up to 24 hours to permit the completion of a missed surveillancewhen the time allowed by the ACTION requirements is less than 24 hours.The 24-hour time limit balances the risks associated with an allowancefor completing the surveillance against the risks associated with the potentialfor a plant transient and a challenge to safety systems when the alternativeis a shutdown to comply with ACTION requirements before the surveillancecan be completed, and is consistent with the guidance provided in GL 87-09.Currently, TS 4.0.4 prohibits entry into an OPERATIONAL CONDITION unlessthe SR associated with the LCO have been performed within the applicablesurveillance interval. This creates a conflict when a mode change is required,as a consequence of shutdown ACTION requirements, and the associated SRthat become applicable have not been performed within the specified surveillanceinterval. The proposed revision would clarify TS 4.0.4 by adding the sentence:``This provision shall not prevent passage through or to OPERATIONAL CONDITIONS,as required to comply with ACTION requirements.'' The proposed revisionto TS 4.0.3 would permit a delay of up to 24 hours in the applicabilityof the ACTION requirements, allow sufficient time for the completion ofthose SR that become applicable when an exception to TS 4.0.4 is allowed.The proposed revision would incorporate slightly modified versions of theTS Bases 3.0 and 4.0 presented in GL 87-09. Also, to prevent operator confusion,the proposed revision would remove specific reference to the non-applicabilityof TS 3.0.4 from TS 3/4.3.1 (Reactor Trip System Instrumentation), TS 3/4.3.2(Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation), TS 3/4.3.3(Monitoring Instrumentation), TS 3/4.4.10 (Structural Integrity), TS 3/4.7.9(Sealed Source Contamination), TS 3/4.7.12 (Area Temperature Monitoring),TS 3/4.8.4 (Electrical Equipment Protective Devices), TS 3/4.9.7 (CraneTravel_Fuel Handling Building), TS 3/4.9.9 (Containment Ventilation IsolationSystem), TS 3/4.9.11 (Water Level_New and Spent Fuel Pools), TS 3/4.9.12(Fuel Handling Building Emergency Exhaust System), TS 3/4.11.1 (LiquidEffluents), TS 3/4.11.2 (Gaseous Effluents), TS 3/4.11.3 (Solid RadioactiveWastes), TS 3/4.11.4 (Total Dose), TS 3/4.12.1 (Monitoring Program), TS3/4.12.2 (Land Use Census), and TS 3/4.12.3 (Interlaboratory ComparisonProgram).<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>As stated in 10 CFR 50.92, the Commission has provided guidelines and standardsfor determining whether a significant hazards consideration exists. Accordingto 10 CFR 50.92(c), the Commission may make a final determination thata proposed amendment to an operating license for a facility involves nosignificant hazards consideration if operation of the facility in accordancewith the proposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated;or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety.The licensee has evaluated the proposed changes in the plant TechnicalSpecifications in accordance with the standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) andhas determined that operation of SHNPP in accordance with these changeswould not:(1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated.The operational flexibility that would result from the proposed revisionto TS 3.0.4 is consistent with that allowed by the existing individualLCO and their associated ACTION requirements, which provide an acceptablelevel of safety for continued operation. A delay of up to 24 hours provided by TS 4.0.3 to permit the completionof a missed surveillance when the time allowed by the ACTION requirementsis less than 24 hours reduces the probability of a transient occurringwhen the affected system or component is either out of service to allowperformance of the surveillance test, or there is a lower level of confidencein the operability because the normal surveillance interval was exceeded.The proposed revision to TS 4.0.4 makes it clear that TS 4.0.4 does notprevent passage through or to OPERATIONAL CONDITIONS as required to complywith ACTION requirements. The revisions of the TS Bases 3.0 and 4.0 andthe elimination of specific exemptions to TS 3.0.4 are administrative innature and, therefore, do not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. The proposed revisions result in improved Technical Specifications by removing(a) unnecessary restrictions on mode changes and facility operation, (b)unnecessary shutdowns caused by inadvertently exceeding surveillance intervals,and (c) conflicts within the Technical Specifications themselves. The revisions to the TS Bases 3.0 and 4.0 and the elimination of specificexemptions to TS 3.0.4 are administrative in nature and, therefore, donot create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The operational flexibility that would result from the proposed revisionto TS 3.0.4 is consistent with that allowed by the existing individualLCO and their associated ACTION requirements, which provide an acceptablelevel of safety for continued operation. A delay of up to 24 hours provided by TS 4.0.3 to permit the completionof a missed surveillance, when the time allowed by the ACTION requirementis less than 24 hours, reduces the probability of a transient occurringwhen the affected system or component is either out of service to allowperformance of the surveillance test, or there is a lower level of confidencein the operability because the normal surveillance interval was exceeded.The proposed revision to TS 4.0.4 makes it clear that TS 4.0.4 does notprevent passage through or to OPERATIONAL CONDITIONS as required to complywith ACTION requirements. The revisions to the TS Bases 3.0 and 4.0 andthe elimination of specific exemptions to TS 3.0.4 are administrative innature and, therefore, do not involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety. These revisions would result in improved Technical Specificationsand, therefore, would increase the margin of safety. The NRC staff believes that the proposed changes to the Technical Specificationsmeet the criteria specified in 10 CFR 50.92(c) and, hence, proposes todetermine that they involve no significant hazards considerations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Richard B. Harrison Library,1313 New Bern Avenue, Raleigh, North Carolina 27610. <T3>Attorney for licensee:</T3> R.E. Jones, General Counsel, Carolina Powerandamp; Light Company, Raleigh, North Carolina 27602. <T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> Elinor G. Adensam.<ITAG tagnum="85">Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire NuclearStation, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> November 3, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed amendments wouldchange Technical Specification (TS) 4.7.8, SNUBBERS, to correct a typographicalerror. Specifically, the sentence in surveillance specification 4.7.8e.3)which begins ``This plan be plotted . . . .'' would be corrected to read``This can be plotted. . . .'' Also, TS Figure 3/4 7-1, ``Nuclear Service Water System'' (NSWS) wouldbe replaced by a more legible figure, with full (rather than abbreviated)valve designation. The intent of the figure is to designate which linesand valves of the NSWS are shared between the two McGuire units. If a sharedcomponent of the NSWS becomes inoperable, both units are affected and bothunits must comply with the ACTION requirements of TS 3.7.4b, ``NuclearService Water System.'' The proposed changes to Figure 3/4 7-1 make itclearer to plant operating personnel which NSWS components are shared betweenthe two units. The revised line and valve designations do not make anychange in existing system design, equipment, power source or plant operatingpractice. <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thestandards for determining whether a significant hazard exists by providingcertain examples (51 FR 7744). One of the examples of actions involvingno significant hazards considerations is example (i) ``a purely administrativechange to technical specifications; for example, a change to achieve consistencythroughout the technical specifications, correction of an error, or a changein nomenclature.'' The requested changes to correct a typographical errorand substitute an improved figure have as no safety implication, are purelyadministrative, and match this example. Accordingly, the Commission proposesto determine that the proposed amendment would involve no significant hazardsconsiderations. <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Atkins Library, Universityof North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223. <T3>Attorney for licensee:</T3> Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242. <T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> David B. Matthews, Director.<ITAG tagnum="85">Louisiana Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-382, Waterford SteamElectric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> December 6, 1988.<T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldchange the Technical Specifications by deleting requirements for overcurrentprotection on disconnected motor-operated-valve actuator compartment-heaterbreakers. from Table 3.8-1.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has performed an analysis of the safety significance of disconnectingcompartment heaters to motor operated valves (MOV) and deleting the requirementto perform overcurrent protections testing on the circuits. The heatersplay no functional role in Limitorque actuator operation. Because disconnectingcompartment heaters does not change any MOV safety role, the probabilityand consequences of all accidents remains as before.Therefore, the proposed change will not involve a significant increasein the probability or consequences of any accident previously evaluated.The MOV compartment heaters protect the internals from condensation duringstorage in uncontrolled atmospheres and for extended periods of no maintenanceor inspection. Valves and their operators installed in various plant systemsreceive regular maintenance. Disconnecting in-service valve operator heaterseliminates a failure mode identified in Information Notice 86-71. Limitorqueclearly states that the motor operator IEEE qualification tests were successfulwithout using heaters.Therefore, the proposed change will not create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated.Specification 3/4.8.4 intends to limit potential damage to conductors internalto electrical penetration assemblies. The role of the four penetrationassemblies involved remain unchanged by disconnecting compartment heaters.The heater usefulness manifests only during valve storage. LCO 3.8.4.1allows de-energized circuits instead of primary and backup overcurrentprotection.Therefore, the proposed change will not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety.We have reviewed the licensee's analysis and agree. Based on the aboveconsiderations, the staff proposes to determine that the amendment involveno significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>University of New OrleansLibrary, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>Bruce W. Churchill, Esq., Shaw, Pittman,Potts and Trowbridge, 2300 N St., N.W., Washington, D.C. 20037.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Jose A. Calvo.<ITAG tagnum="85">Omaha Public Power District, Docket No. 50-285, Fort Calhoun Station,Unit No. 1, Washington County, Nebraska</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 16, 1988<T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>This proposed amendment wouldrevise the Technical Specifications (ST) to (1) change the Safety Injectionand Refueling Water Tank minimum temperature from 40anddegrees;F to 50anddegrees;F,(2) change the title of the Senior Vice President_Nuclear Operations, ProductionOperations, Production Engineering, and Quality and Environmental Affairsto Senior Vice President_Nuclear Operations, Production Engineering, andQuality and Environmental Affairs in order to reflect the current organizationalstructure, and (3) correct errors in references and a mailing address.Additionally, the proposed amendment would revise Facility Operating LicenseDPR-40 to delete present paragraph 3.E, dealing with the Spent Fuel PoolModification, since the modification is complete and the applicable TechnicalSpecification requirements are in effect.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with the proposedamendment would not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licenseeaddressed the above three standards in the amendment application.With regard to the three standards concerning increase in the Safety Injectionand Refueling Water Tank (SIRWT) minimum temperature, the licensee statesthat operation of the facility in accordance with this amendment wouldnot:(a) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences ofan accident previously evaluated. The increase in minimum temperature isa conservative change. The change merely increases the minimum SIRWT temperatureto match the tested values. No new accidents are created nor are the consequencesof any existing accidents increased by this change because the change willresult in a less severe pump thermal transient. This change is boundedby test data and current Technical Specification limitations. Therefore,this change does not increase the probability or consequences of a previouslyevaluated accident.(b) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident fromany accident previously evaluated. This change does not propose new ordifferent modes of operation for the plant. The continued use of the sameTechnical Specification administrative controls prevents the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident.(c) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. This changeincreases the minimum SIRWT temperature for pump thermal transient considerationsin a conservative direction. Therefore, this change will not cause anyreduction in the margin of safety.The Commission has provided guidance concerning the application of thestandards for determining whether a significant hazards consideration existsby providing examples (51 FR 7751) of amendments that are considered notlikely to involve significant hazards consideration. The proposed changeto increase the minimum SIRWT temperature is an additional restrictionto the allowable temperature range for the SIRWT and is, thus, similarto example (ii): ``A change that constitutes an additional limitation,restriction, or control not presently included in the technical specifications,e.g., a more stringent surveillance requirement.'' The proposed changesto correct the titles in the organizational structure, to correct references,and delete the operating license condition in this amendment are similarto example (i): ``A purely administrative change to technical specifications,for example, a change to achieve consistency throughout the technical specifications,correction of an error, or a change in nomenclature.''  Accordingly, the staff proposes to determine that the proposed changesto the technical specifications and to the Facility Operating License donot involve a significant hazards consideration.  <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> W. Dale Clark Library, 215South 15th Street, Omaha, Nebraska 68102.  <T3>Attorney for licensee:</T3> LeBoeuf, Lamb, Leiby, and MacRae, 1333New Hampshire Avenue, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20036.  <T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> Jose A. Calvo.  <ITAG tagnum="85">Power Authority of The State of New York, Docket No. 50-286, IndianPoint Nuclear Generating Unit No. 3, Westchester County, New York  </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> November 10, 1988 <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The licensee has provided, inpart, the following description:  This application for amendment to the Indian Point 3 Technical Specificationsseeks to replace the organization charts contained in Section 6.2 of AppendixA with more general organizational requirements. These general requirements,in accordance with Generic Letter 88-06 (GL 88-06), incorporate with onedeviation those organizational features currently depicted on the chartsthat are important for ensuring that the plant will be operated safely.The one deviation taken from the requirements of GL 88-06 is the deletionof the requirement that the Operations Superintendent maintain a SeniorReactor Operator license.The proposed changes include:  (1) Deletion of organization charts, figures 6.2-1 and 6.2-2.  (2) Deletion of references made to those figures from Technical Specificationsections 6.1, 6.2, 6.3, and the List of Figures.  (3) Deletion of requirement that Operations Superintendent maintain a SeniorReactor Operator (SRO) license.  (4) Addition of general requirements to sections 6.2.1 and 6.2.2.  (5) Addition to Table of Contents.  Additionally, proposed changes not related to the subject generic letterinclude:  (1) Deletion of figure titles 2.1-2, 3.10-5, and 4.2-2 from the List ofFigures.    (2) Addition of figure title 3.8-1 to the list of Figures.  These last two changes are editorial in nature. Figures 2.1-2 and 3.10-5were deleted from the Technical Specifications by Amendment No. 48 to theFacility Operating License; Figure 4.2-2 was deleted by Amendment No. 57,and Figure 3.8-1 was added by Amendment No. 70. The changes to the Listof Figures were inadvertently overlooked.  <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) Create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; or (3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The licensee made the following analysis of these changes:  1. Does the proposed license amendment involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated?  <T3>Response:</T3> The proposed amendment does not involve a significantincrease in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluatedbecause deletion of the organization charts from the Technical Specificationsdoes not affect plant operation. As in the past, the NRC will continueto be informed of organizational changes through other required controls.The Code of Federal Regulations, Title 10, Part 50.34(b)(6)(i) requiresthat the licensee's organizational structure, responsibilities and authorities,and personnel qualification requirements be included in the Final SafetyAnalysis Report (FSAR). As required by 10 CFR 50.71(e), the Authority submitsannual updates to the FSAR. Chapter 12 of the IP-3 FSAR provides a descriptionof the organization, and organization charts to the same level of detailas currently exists in the Technical Specifications have been includedvia the 1988 IP-3 FSAR Update.  2. Does the proposed license amendment create the possibility of a newor different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? <T3>Response:</T3> The proposed amendment does not create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from that previously evaluated becausethe proposed changes do not involve any physical alterations of plant configurationor changes to setpoints or operating parameters.  3. Does the proposed amendment involve significant reduction in a marginof safety?  <T3>Response:</T3> The proposed amendment does not involve a significantreduction in a margin of safety. Through the Authority's Quality Assuranceprogram and its commitment to maintain only qualified personnel in positionsof responsibility, it is assured that safety functions performed by theonsite and the corporate organizations will continue to be performed ata high level of competence.  Based on the above, the staff proposes todetermine that the proposed changes do not involve a significant hazardsconsideration.    <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> White Plains Public Library,100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10601. <T3>Attorney for licensee:</T3> Mr. Charles M. Pratt, 10 Columbus Circle,New York, New York 10019. <T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> Robert A. Capra, Director.  <ITAG tagnum="85">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket Nos. 50-272 and50-311, Salem Generating Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Salem County, NewJersey  </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> June 23, 1988  <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed amendment wouldchange surveillance requirements 4.1.3.4 and 4.1.3.5 to eliminate the requirementto verify shutdown rod and control bank rod positions within one hour afterrod motion. Also, a footnote would be added to clarify that SurveillanceRequirement 4.1.3.4a is applicable prior to withdrawing control banks inpreparation for entering Mode 2 (Startup).  <T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.  The licensee proposes to correct an error in Surveillance Requirement 4.1.3.4and 4.1.3.5 that requires shutdown rod positions and control bank rod positionsbe verified within one hour of rod motion. In addition, a footnote wouldbe added to Technical Specification 3.1.3.4 clarifying that SurveillanceRequirement 4.1.3.4a is applicable while in Mode 3 and preparing to enterMode 2 withdrawal of the control banks.The licensee has provided an analysis as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21">The proposed changes to Technical Specifications 3/4.1.3.4 and 3/4.1.3.5for both Salem 1 and 2 do not:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. Verifying rod position and rod positionindicators on a nominal basis of once per 12 hours with more frequent verificationrequired if an automatic monitoring channel is inoperable is acceptableas per the basis of these Technical Specification Surveillance [SIC]. Thebases state that the verification frequencies are adequate for assuringthat the applicable LCO's are satisfied.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The change does not alter the use of the rod control system and operationof the plant would remain the same. The operation of the rods will stillbe consistent with present criteria which has been established and consideredin the consequences of the accidents already evaluated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom an accident previously evaluated. The requested change does not alterthe surveillances in any way which is outside the scope of the intent indicatedin the bases of the Salem and Westinghouse Standard Technical SpecificationSurveillances. The revised surveillance will continue to assure that theapplicable LCO's are satisfied and will be consistent with other Westinghousedesigned plants. The operation of the rod control system will not changeand therefore, no new or different kinds of accidents can be created.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The changein the surveillance requirement does not affect the operation of the rodcontrol system in any way. The change only affects the frequency that theposition of the rods are documented. Independent of the requirement forverification of rod position once every 12 hours, the operators have continuousdisplay of rod positions. Since the proposed change does not affect theminimum surveillance frequency of 12 hours as supported in the bases, thechange does not reduce the margin of safety.</ITAG>We have reviewed the licensee's determinations and agree with them. Basedon the above discussion, the staff proposes to determine that the proposedamendment does not involve a significant hazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Salem Free Public Library,112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079.<T3>Attorney for licensee:</T3> Mark J. Wetterhahn, Esquire, Conner andWetterhahn, Suite 1050, 1747 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20006.<T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> Walter R. Butler.<ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Dockets Nos. 50-259, 50-260 and 50-296,Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1, 2 and 3, Limestone County, Alabama</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests:</T3> October 24, 1988 (TS 258).<T3>Description of amendment requests:</T3> The proposed amendments wouldchange the expiration dates for the Operating License DPR-33 (Unit 1) fromMay 10, 2007 to December 20, 2013, for Operating License DPR-52 (Unit 2)from May 10, 2007 to June 28, 2014, and for Operating License DPR-68 (Unit3) from July 31, 2008 to July 2, 2016.The current operating license expiration dates are 40 years from the dateof issuance of the construction permits (May 10, 1967 for Units 1 and 2and July 31, 1968 for Unit 3). Because of the time required between theissuance of the construction permits and the full-power operating licensesthe effective period for the operating licenses is approximately 33 years.The licensee's application requests a 40 year operating license term fromthe date of issuance of initial operating license for all the three unitsbecause the units were designed and constructed on the basis of 40 yearsof plant operation. Although this does not mean that some components willnot wear out during the plant lifetime, design features were incorporatedwhich maximize the inspectability of structures, systems, and equipment.Surveillance and maintenance practices which have been implemented in accordancewith the American Society of Mechanical Engineers Code and technical specificationsprovide assurance that any unexpected degradation in plant equipment willbe identified and corrected.The original design of the reactor pressure vessel (RPV) and associatedinternals considered the effects of 40 years of operation within the cycliclimits given in the Browns Ferry Final Safety Analysis Report (Section4.2). Those cyclic limits equate to 40 years of operation at full powerwith a plant capacity factor of 80% (i.e., 32 effective full power years),including expected operational and thermal transients. In addition, theRVP stress analyses include appropriate consideration of thermal transientand fatigue effects which may be expected during the extended period ofoperation.Aging analyses are being performed for all safety-related electrical equipmentwithin the scope of 10 CFR 50.49, ``Environmental Qualification of ElectricalEquipment Important to Safety for Nuclear Power Plants.'' The qualifiedlife of the equipment or component will be incorporated within Browns Ferrymaintenance and replacement practices to ensure that the subject safety-relatedelectrical equipment remains qualified and available to perform its intendedsafety function regardless of the overall age of the plant.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis.<ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase inthe probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated. Thischange does not involve any changes to the design or operation of BFN.Therefore, no change will be made that could alter postulated scenariosregarding accident initiation or response. In addition this proposed amendmentdoes not require any changes to the safety analysis. There are no modificationsto the facility procedures or technical specifications. Existing surveillance,inspection, testing, and maintenance practices provide assurance that degradationin plant equipment, structures, or components will be identified and correctedas necessary throughout the life of the facility. The operation of BFNin accordance with the existing programs will ensure that plant operationwill be bounded by the BFN Final Safety Analysis Report (FSAR) and FinalEnvironmental Statement as amendment.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident previously evaluated. This amendment does notinvolve any change to the physical structure or any of the components orsystems of the plant. This proposed change is administrative in natureand does not exceed any of the analysis as evaluated in the BFN FSAR.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed amendment does not involve a significant reductionin a margin of safety. There are no changes in the design, design basis,or operation of the facility. This change does not require any technicalspecification changes. Existing surveillance, inspection, testing and maintenanceprograms will provide assurance that degradation of equipment, structuresor components will be identified and corrected throughout the lifetimeof the facility. These practices will be maintained throughout the operatinglife of BFN and therefore assuring that there will not be any significantreduction in the margin of safety.</ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Athens Public Library, SouthStreet, Athens, Alabama, 35611.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902.<T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black.<ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>December 6, 1988 (TS 88-26).<T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The Tennessee Valley Authority(TVA) proposes to modify the Sequoyah Nuclear Plant (SQN) Units 1 and 2Technical Specifications (TS). The changes are to add a footnote to limitingcondition for operation (LCO) 3.4.2 for the reactor coolant system (RCS)safety valves for both units. The footnote would allow all three safetyvalves to be tested at the same time provided the valves are removed andthe hole in the system is covered by a non-pressure-retaining membrane.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>TVA provided the following information on the proposed TS changesin its submittal:<ITAG tagnum="21">LCO 3.4.2 requires at least one pressurizer code safety valve to beoperable during modes 4 and 5 (shutdown conditions). The basis for thisrequirement ensures adequate relief capacity for any overpressure conditionthat could occur during shutdown. However, the actual wording of the LCOprevents full valve testing if all three valves are to be tested at thesame time.</ITAG>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration. Therefore, in accordancewith 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licensee has performed and providedthe following analysis:<ITAG tagnum="21">TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification change andhas determined that it does not represent a significant hazards considerationbased on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of SQN in accordancewith the proposed amendment will not:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The intent of the LCO has not beenchanged. Pressure relief capabilities for overpressure protection stillexist. The proposed change simply allows for more efficient testing techniques.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. No hardware changes or operating changesare being made. The valves will still be tested in accordance with ASMEsection XI.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The removalof all three safety valves at the same time does not reduce the pressurerelief capabilities; thus, the margin of safety is not changed.</ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902.<T3>NRC Assistant Director: </T3>Suzanne Black.<ITAG tagnum="84">Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-327 and 50-328, SequoyahNuclear Plant, Units 1 and 2, Hamilton County, Tennessee</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment requests: </T3>December 6, 1988 (TS 88-29).<T3>Description of amendment requests: </T3>The Tennessee Valley Authority(TVA) proposes to modify the Sequoyah Nuclear Plant Units 1 and 2 TechnicalSpecifications (TS). The changes are to delete surveillance requirement(SR) 4.4.3.2.3 for the pressurizer power-operated relief valves (PORVs)and associated block valves. This SR demonstrates the operability of theemergency power supply for these valves.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>TVA provided the following information on the proposed TS change inits submittal:<ITAG tagnum="21">The pressurizer PORVs have been changed from air-operated to solenoidoperated valves in order to meet requirements of NUREG-0737. The PORVsare now permanently aligned to the 125-volt (V) direct current (dc) vitalbattery boards, which are the emergency power supply. Therefore, no transferis required to demonstrate operability of the emergency power supply.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The block valves are motor-operated valves (MOVs) powered from the480-V reactor MOV boards, which are powered by the shutdown boards. Theemergency power transfer is performed at the feed to the 6.9-kilovolt (kV)shutdown boards by transfer from offsite power to the diesel generators(DGs). Emergency power supply operability to the shutdown boards is accomplishedby SR 4.8.1.1.2. Thus, the requirements for block valve operation providesno additional assurance of emergency power supply operability.</ITAG>The Commission has provided Standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). 10 CFR 50.91requires that at the time a licensee requests an amendment, it must provideto the Commission its analyses, using the standards in Section 50.92, onthe issue of no significant hazards consideration.Therefore, in accordance with 10 CFR 50.91 and 10 CFR 50.92, the licenseehas performed and provided the following analysis:<ITAG tagnum="21">TVA has evaluated the proposed technical specification change andhas determined that it does not represent a significant hazards considerationbased on criteria established in 10 CFR 50.92(c). Operation of SQN in accordancewith the proposed amendment will not:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequencesof an accident previously evaluated. The pressurizer PORVs are designedto limit pressurizer pressure and prevent the undesirable opening of thesafety valves. The PORVs are also used for automatic and manual pressurecontrol. The FSAR [Sequoyah Final Safety Analysis Report] analysis foroverpressure protection assumes that the PORVs do not actuate. The steamgenerator safety valves and pressurizer safety valves provide the requiredpressure relief. However, the FSAR accident analysis for a steam generatortube rupture does rely on the PORVs for pressure reductions.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The intent of the subject SR for the PORVs and associated block valvesis to demonstrate operability of the emergency power supply. Because powersupply operability for these valves is included in other SRs with equaltime interval requirements, no additional operability assurance is gainedby this redundant testing. Existing SRs for the PORVs and block valves,along with the existing SRs for emergency power supplies, provide adequateassurance of valve capability to functionally control pressure. Thus, theproposed change does not affect the probability or consequences of an accidentpreviously analyzed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentfrom any previously analyzed. The deletion of the subject SR does not requireany hardware changes nor any change to the operating procedures. This changesimply removes an unnecessary operator burden during performances of theDG test sequences and avoids any potential confusion about the intent ofthe requirement. Thus, the possibility of a new or different kind of accidentis not created.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The intendeddesign and operation of the PORVs and block valves have not been changed.Appropriate testing of the valves and power supplies still exists. Thus,the margin of safety has not been changed.</ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. Therefore, the staffproposes to determine that the application for amendments involves no significanthazards considerations.<T3>Local Public Document Room location</T3>: Chattanooga-Hamilton CountyLibrary, 1001 Broad Street, Chattanooga, Tennessee 37402.<T3>Attorney for licensee</T3>: General Counsel, Tennessee Valley Authority,400 West Summit Hill Drive, E11 B33, Knoxville, Tennessee 37902.<T3>NRC Assistant Director</T3>: Suzanne Black.<ITAG tagnum="84">Union Electric Company, Docket No. 50-483, Callaway Plant, Unit 1,Callaway County, Missouri</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment</T3>: December 16, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> The proposed amendment would reviseTechnical Specification 5.3.2 to allow the use of hafnium, silver-indium-cadmium(Ag-In-Cd), or a mixture of both types as the absorber material in rodcluster control assemblies (RCCA).<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination</T3>:The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards consideration exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92. A proposed amendmentto an operating license for a facility involves no significant hazardsconsideration if operation of the facility in accordance with a proposedamendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated, (2) create the possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated,or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee has provided the following analysis of no significant hazardsconsiderations using the Commission's standards.The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated. This license amendmentrequest will allow the use of Ag-In-Cd in RCCA's at Callaway Plant. TheseRCCA's will meet the same mechanical, nuclear, and thermal hydraulic limitsas originally approved for hafnium RCCA's and described in FSAR Chapter4.The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or differentkind of accident from any previously evaluated. As discussed above, RCCA'swith Ag-In-Cd absorber material satisfies the same design limits as anoriginal RCCA.The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a marginof safety. As discussed above, the use of RCCA's with Ag-In-Cd absorbermaterial will not result in an existing design limit being exceeded.Based on the previous discussions, the licensee concluded that the proposedamendment request does not involve a significant increase in the probabilityor consequences of an accident previously evaluated; does not create thepossibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previouslyevaluated; does not involve a reduction in the required margin of safety.The staff has reviewed the licensee's no significant hazards considerationdetermination and agrees with the licensee's analysis. The staff, therefore,proposes to determine that the licensee's request does not involve a significanthazards consideration.<T3>Local Public Document Room location</T3>: Callaway County Public Library,710 Court Street, Fulton, Missouri 65251 and the John M. Olin Library,Washington University, Skinker and Lindell Boulevards, St. Louis, Missouri63130.<T3>Attorney for licensee</T3>: Gerald Charnoff, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Pottsandamp; Trowbridge, 2300 N Street, NW., Washington, DC. 20037.<T3>NRC Project Director</T3>: John N. Hannon.<ITAG tagnum="84">Vermont Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-271, VermontYankee Nuclear Power Station, Vernon, Vermont</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment</T3>: November 30, 1988.<T3>Description of amendment request</T3>: Amendment would revise the fuelcladding integrity safety limit (FCISL) in the Technical Specifications.<T3>Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination:</T3>The Commission has provided standards for determining whether a significanthazards determination exists as stated in 10 CFR 50.92(c). A proposed amendmentto an operating license involves no signfiicant hazards considerationsif operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendmentwould not: (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or possibilityof a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated;or (2) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety.The licensee's analyses contained in the November 30, 1988 letter statesthe following:<ITAG tagnum="21">Three standards defined in 10 CFR 50.92 are used to arrive at a determinationthat this request for amendment involves no significant hazards considerations.The discussion below addresses these three standards and demonstrates thatoperating the facility in accordance with this proposed change involvesno significant hazards considerations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The proposed changes will not involve any significant increasein the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated.No changes are being made to the facility or its equipment so there isno increase of the probability of any previously analyzed event.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the P8X8R, BP8X8R, GE8X8E, or GE8X8EB with R factors [greaterthan] 1.04, the 1.04 FCISL provides the same degree of assurance for fuelcladding integrity during an abnormal event as the 1.07 FCISL does forall other core loadings (See NRC SER of December 27, 1987). Since VermontYankee uses and will install these GE fuel types in future reloads, theuse of the 1.04 FCISL does not increase the consequences of any event previouslyanalyzed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. The proposed change will not create the possibility of a new ordifferent kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated sincethe facility is not being changed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. The proposed change will not involve a significant reduction inthe margin of safety. The use of 1.04 as the minimum critical power ratioFCISL reflects the utilization of current GE fuel designs and does providethe same margin of safety as 1.07 does with the older GE fuel types asdiscussed in the SER included with the NRC letter to General Electric Company,dated December 27, 1987.</ITAG>The staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and agrees with it. Therefore,we conclude that the amendment satisfies the three criteria listed in 10CFR 50.92. Based on that conclusion, the staff proposes to make a no significanthazards consideration determination.<T3>Local Public Document Room Location: </T3>Brooks Memorial Library,224 Main Street, Brattleboro, Vermont 05301.<T3>Attorney for licensee: </T3>John A. Ritscher, Esq., Ropes andamp; Gray,225 Franklin Street, Boston, Massachusetts 02110.<T3>NRC Project Director: </T3>Richard H. Wessman, Director.<ITAG tagnum="84">PREVIOUSLY PUBLISHED NOTICES OF CONSIDERATION OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENTSTO OPERATING LICENSES AND PROPOSED NO SIGNIFICANT HAZARDS CONSIDERATIONDETERMINATION AND OPPORTUNITY FOR HEARING</ITAG>The following notices were previously published as separate individualnotices. The notice content was the same as above. They were publishedas individual notices either because time did not allow the Commissionto wait for this biweekly notice or because the action involved exigentcircumstances. They are repeated here because the biweekly notice listsall amendments issued or proposed to be issued involving no significanthazards consideration.For details, see the individual notice in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on the day and page cited. This notice does notextend the notice period of the original notice.<ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-424, VogtleElectric Generating Plant, Unit 1, Burke County, Georgia</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 6, 1988.<T3>Description of amendment request:</T3>The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specification requirementsfor the Control Room Emergency Filtration System and its associated actuationinstrumentation to reflect the control room configuration for two-unitoperation.<T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: December 16, 1988 (53 FR 50606).<T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>January 17, 1989.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Burke County Public Library,412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830.<ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-424, VogtleElectric Generating Plant, Unit 1, Burke County, Georgia</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> December 6, 1988.<T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment reviseTechnical Specification sections which would require that diesel generatorvoltage be within a specified range during surveillance testing.<T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: December 15, 1988 (53 FR 50480).<T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>January 17, 1989.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Burke County Public Library,412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830.<ITAG tagnum="84">Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal ElectricAuthority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket No. 50-424, VogtleElectric Generating Plant, Unit 1, Burke County, Georgia</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>December 12, 1988.<T3>Description of amendment request: </T3>The proposed amendment wouldreplace the Unit 1 Technical Specifications with combined Technical Specificationsfor Units 1 and 2.<T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: December 27, 1988 (53 FR 52266)<T3>Expiration date of individual notice:</T3> January 26, 1989. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Burke County Public Library,412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830. <ITAG tagnum="84">Public Service Electric andamp; Gas Company, Docket No. 50-354, HopeCreek Generating Station, Salem County, New Jersey </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>October 26, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed amendmentwould revise the spent fuel storage capacity limitation presently statedin the Technical Specifications (TSs), Design Features Section 5.6.3. toread, ``The spent fuel storage pool shall be limited to a storage capacityof no more than 1290 fuel assemblies.'' <T3>Date of publication of individual notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: December 12, 1988 (53 FR 49945) <T3>Expiration date of individual notice: </T3>January 11, 1989. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Pennsville Public Library,190 S. Broadway, Pennsville, New Jersey 08070. <ITAG tagnum="84">NOTICE OF ISSUANCE OF AMENDMENT TO FACILITY OPERATING LICENSE</ITAG>During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commissionhas issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined foreach of these amendments that the application complies with the standardsand requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act),and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriatefindings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulationsin 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility OperatingLicense and Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determinationand Opportunity for Hearing in connection with these actions was publishedin the <T4>Federal Register </T4>as indicated. No request for a hearing or petitionfor leave to intervene was filed following this notice. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendmentssatisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR51.22 Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impact statementor environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments. If theCommission has prepared an environmental assessment under the special circumstancesprovision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determination based on thatassessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applicationsfor amendments, (2) the amendments, and (3) the Commission's related letters,Safety Evaluations and/or Environmental Assessments as indicated. All ofthese items are available for public inspection at the Commission's PublicDocument Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, N.W., Washington, D.C.,and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved.A copy of items (2) and (3) may be obtained upon request addressed to theU.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, D.C. 20555, Attention:Director, Division of Reactor Projects. <ITAG tagnum="84">Arkansas Power andamp; Light Company, Docket No. 50-313, Arkansas NuclearOne, Unit 1, Pope County, Arkansas </ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request: </T3>July 20, 1988<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications to specifically provide for a 1 gallon per minute limiton primary-to-secondary leak rate (total steam generator tube leakage).<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 15, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 15, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>115.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-51. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: September 7, 1988 (53 FR 34601). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 15, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Tomlinson Library, ArkansasTech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801. <ITAG tagnum="84">Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-317 and 50-318,Calvert Cliffs Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Calvert County,Maryland</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 16, 1988, as supplementedon November 29, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The proposed Technical Specification(TS) amendments added the definition, ``Refueling Interval_At least onceper 24 months,'' to Table 1.2 of the Units 1 and 2 TS Definition 1.22,``Frequency Notation.''<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 21, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 21, 1988. <T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>133 and 114.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-53 and DPR-69. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>October 19, 1988 (53 FR 40982). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 21, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Calvert County Library, PrinceFrederick, Maryland. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-325, BrunswickSteam Electric Plant, Unit 1, Brunswick County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>June 27, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) Tables 3.3.5.6-1, 3.3.5.6-2 and 4.3.5.6-1 to replaceinstrument tag number TS-CR-863 with TS-CIT-863-3. The change reflectsan upgrading of instrumentation during a planned plant modification. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 20, 1988. <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 20, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>120.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-71: </T3>Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46139). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 20, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297. <ITAG tagnum="84">Carolina Power andamp; Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-325, BrunswickSteam Electric Plant, Unit 1, Brunswick County, North Carolina </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>June 9, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revises TechnicalSpecification (TS) Tables 3.3.5.2-1 and 4.3.5.2-1 to reflect changed equipmentnumbers to comply with 10 CFR Part 50, Appendix R, Section III.G, AlternativeShutdown Capabilities. <T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 20, 1988. <T3>Effective date: </T3>December 20, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>121.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-71:</T3> Amendment revises the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46138). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 20, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> University of North Carolinaat Wilmington, William Madison Randall Library, 601 S. College Road, Wilmington,North Carolina 28403-3297.<ITAG tagnum="84">Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-456 and 50-457, BraidwoodStation, Units 1 and 2, Ogle County, Illinois</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments:</T3> November 26, 1986 and January14, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendments:</T3> These amendments modified paragraph2.F of License Nos. NPF-72 and NPF-77 to require compliance with the revisedPhysical Security Plan. This plan was updated to conform to the latestrequirements of 10 CFR 73.55. Consistent with the provision of 10 CFR 73.55,search requirements must be implemented within 60 days and miscellaneousamendments within 180 days from the effective date of this amendment.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Amendment Nos.:</T3> 13, 13.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-72 and NPF-77.</T3> The amendmentsrevised the Technical Specification.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46139) and a SafeguardsEvaluation Report dated December 19, 1988. The Commission's related evaluationof the amendments is contained in a letter to Commonwealth Edison Companydated December 19, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Wilmington Township PublicLibrary, 201 S. Kankakee Street, Wilmington, Illinois 60481.<ITAG tagnum="84">Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-213, HaddamNeck Plant, Middlesex County Connecticut; and Northeast Nuclear EnergyCompany, et al., Docket Nos. 50-245 and 50-336, Millstone Nuclear PowerStation, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, New London County, Connecticut</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments:</T3> February 17, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendments:</T3> The Technical Specification changesconcern the requirements for the minimum shift crew composition to recognizethe acceptability of the use of qualified individuals in the dual-roleof senior reactor operator/shift technical advisor position.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Amendment Nos.:</T3> 110, 27, 136.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-61, DPR-21 and DPR-65.</T3> Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: September 7, 1988 (53 FR 34602). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Russell Library, 123 BroadStreet, Middletown, Connecticut and Waterford Public Library, 49 Rope FerryRoad, Waterford, Connecticut 06385.<ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, CatawbaNuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments:</T3> October 7, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendments:</T3> The amendments modified Section6.2, ``Organization'' of the Technical Specifications to delete the offsiteand onsite organization charts.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 20, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 20, 1988.<T3>Amendment Nos.:</T3> 56 and 49.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-35 and NPF-52. </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46143). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 20, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730.<ITAG tagnum="84">Duke Power Company, et al., Docket No. 50-414, Catawba Nuclear Station,Unit 2, York County, South Carolina</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> September 14, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> The amendment revised licensecondition 2.C.(8)(b) to allow an extension of time for resolution of theSafety Parameter Display System issue.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 28, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 28, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 50.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-52. </T3>Amendment revised theOperating License.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: October 19, 1988 (53 FR 40984). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 28, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> York County Library, 138East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730.<ITAG tagnum="84">Duquesne Light Company, Docket No. 50-412, Beaver Valley Power Station,Unit No. 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> October 24, 1988, and supplementedby letter dated November 3, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> The amendment revises the schedulesof a number of 18-month surveillances to permit performance of these surveillancesto be postponed to the first refueling outage.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.: </T3>10. <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-73. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46144). The November3, 1988 submittal provided additional clarifying information and did notchange the determination of the initial notice. The Commission's relatedevaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated December19, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location</T3>: B.F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <ITAG tagnum="84"><T3>Duquesne Light Company, Docket No. 50-334 and 50-412, Beaver ValleyPower Station, Unit No. 1 and 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania.</T3></ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment</T3>: January 27, 1988 and revisedby letter dated July 26, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment</T3>: The amendments clarify severalaction statements regarding reactor trip breakers in Table 3.3-1 of theTechnical Specifications of each unit. <T3>Date of issuance</T3>: December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective date</T3>: December 19, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 134 for Unit 1, 11 for Unit 2. <T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-66. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: September 7, 1988 (53 FR 34603). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location</T3>: B.F. Jones Memorial Library,663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. <ITAG tagnum="84"><T3>Florida Power and Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-335 and 50-389,St. Lucie Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, St. Lucie County, Florida.</T3></ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>June 23, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The amendments changed TechnicalSpecification 4.6.1.2, ``Containment Leakage'' by deleting the referenceto ANSI/ANS Standard N45.4-1972. This change allows for use of the ``masspoint'' method, which is described in ANSI/ANS Standard 56.8-1981 (revised1987), for determination of containment leakage rates. <T3>Date of Issuance:</T3> December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective Date: </T3>December 19, 1988.<T3>Amendment Nos.: </T3>99 and 37.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-67 and NPF-16: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: August 10, 1988 (53 FR 30132). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Indian River Junior CollegeLibrary, 3209 Virginia, Avenue, Ft. Pierce, Florida 33450. <ITAG tagnum="84"><T3>Florida Power and Light Company, et al., Docket No. 50-389, St. LuciePlant, Unit No. 2, St. Lucie County, Florida.</T3></ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 20, 1988, as supplementedNovember 21, 1988. <T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changed the controlelement assembly maximum drop time from 2.7 seconds to 3.1 seconds. <T3>Date of Issuance: </T3>December 19, 1988. <T3>Effective Date: </T3>December 19, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.: </T3>38. <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-16: </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46144). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988. The November 21, 1988 letter provided supplementalinformation which did not alter the staff's initial determination of nosignificant hazards consideration. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Indian River Junior CollegeLibrary, 3209 Virginia Avenue, Ft. Pierce, Florida. <ITAG tagnum="85">Illinois Power Company, Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station,Unit 1, DeWitt County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> September 23, 1988. <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed revision will changethe number of gallons of fuel oil specified for the Division II dieselgenerator (1B). <T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 19, 1988. <T3>Effective date:</T3> December 19, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 13. <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-62.</T3> The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register:</T4> November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46146). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988. <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> The Vespasian Warner PublicLibrary, 120 West Johnson Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727.<ITAG tagnum="85">Illinois Power Company, Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station,Unit 1, DeWitt County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> October 30, 1987. <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed change will correcttypographical errors and clarify existing requirements. <T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 21, 1988. <T3>Effective date:</T3> December 21, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 14. <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-62.</T3> The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register:</T4> January 27, 1988 (53 FR 2319). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 21, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> The Vespasian Warner PublicLibrary, 120 West Johnson Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727.<ITAG tagnum="85">Illinois Power Company, Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station,Unit 1, DeWitt County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> October 30, 1987. <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed change will correcttypographical errors. <T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 29, 1988. <T3>Effective date:</T3> December 29, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 15. <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-62.</T3> The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register:</T4> January 27, 1988 (53 FR 2319). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 29, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> The Vespasian Warner PublicLibrary, 120 West Johnson Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727. <T3>NRC Project Director:</T3> Daniel R. Muller<ITAG tagnum="85">Illinois Power Company, Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station,Unit 1, DeWitt County, Illinois </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> October 30, 1987. <T3>Description of amendment request:</T3> The proposed change will clarifypart ``a'' and ``b'' of Action 70 for Technical Specification Table 3.3.7.1-1.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 29, 1988. <T3>Effective date:</T3> December 29, 1988. <T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 16. <T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-62.</T3> The amendment revised theTechnical Specifications. <T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register:</T4> January 27, 1988 (53 FR 2318). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 29, 1988. <T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No. <T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> The Vespasian Warner PublicLibrary, 120 West Johnson Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727.<ITAG tagnum="85">Long Island Lighting Company, Docket No. 50-322, Shoreham NuclearPower Station, Suffolk County, New York </ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> October 14, 1987.<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>This amendment changed the operatinglicense and the Technical Specifications to correct a typographical errorin Operating License NPF-36 on page 6, subparagraph (8), to make the referenceto 10 CFR 50.59 read 10 CFR 50.49, correct a valve designation, and correcta report title.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 16, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 16, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.: </T3>11.<T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-36. </T3>This amendment revisedthe Technical Specifications and License.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>December 2, 1987 (52 FR 45888). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 16, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Shoreham-Wading River PublicLibrary, Route 25A, Shoreham, New York 11786-9697.<ITAG tagnum="85">Mississippi Power andamp; Light Company, System Energy Resources, Inc.,South Mississippi Electric Power Association, Docket No. 50-416, GrandGulf Nuclear Station, Unit 1, Claiborne County, Mississippi</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 19, 1988, as supplementedOctober 31, 1988, November 11, 1988 and December 7, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment adds a license conditionauthorizing the sale and leaseback by System Energy Resources, Inc. ofa portion of its 90 percent ownership interest in Grand Gulf Nuclear Station,Unit 1.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 19, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.: </T3>54.<T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-29. </T3>This amendment revisesthe License.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46148). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Hinds Junior College, McLendonLibrary, Raymond, Mississippi 39154.<ITAG tagnum="85">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>September 20, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The change modified the TechnicalSpecifications (TS) as follows: (1) the maximum linear heat rate shownin TS Figure 3.2.1 was reduced from 15.6 to 14.0 Kw/ft, and (2) a factorof 1.115 was applied to the total planar radial peaking factor for reactoroperation during Cycle 9 beyond a core average burnup of 10,000 MWD/MTU.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 19, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 19, 1988.Amendment No.: 137.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-65. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 2, 1988 (53 FR 44254). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 19, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385.<ITAG tagnum="85">Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, MillstoneNuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>October 5, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment changes TechnicalSpecification (TS) 3/4.1.1.3, ``Moderator Temperature Coefficient,'' toallow a more negative moderator temperature coefficient in the LimitingCondition for Operation, TS 3.1.1.3b, and in the associated SurveillanceRequirement, TS 4.1.1.3b.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 20, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 20, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.: </T3>29.<T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-49. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register: </T4>November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46149). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 20, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Waterford Public Library,49 Rope Ferry Road, Waterford, Connecticut 06385.<ITAG tagnum="85">Omaha Public Power District, Docket No. 50-285, Fort Calhoun Station,Unit No. 1, Washington County, Nebraska</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> December 2, 1986, as supplemented January9, and September 30, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> This amendment revises paragraph3.C of the license to require compliance with the amended Physical SecurityPlan. This plan was amended to conform to the requirements of 10 CFR 73.55.Consistent with the provisions of 10 CFR 73.55, search requirements mustbe implemented within 60 days and miscellaneous amendments within 180 daysfrom the effective date of this amendment.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 20, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 20, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 118.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-40. </T3>Amendment revised the License.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46149). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safeguards EvaluationReport dated December 20, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> W. Dale Clark Library, 215South 15th Street, Omaha, Nebraska 68102.<ITAG tagnum="85">Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, DiabloCanyon Nuclear Power Plant, Units 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments:</T3> November 10, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendments:</T3> The amendments authorize, forUnit 1 only, an exception to the requirements of Technical Specification4.3.1.1, Table 4.3-1, Item 23, ``Seismic Trip,'' until the next refuelingoutage (currently scheduled for October 1989).<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 29, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 29, 1988.<T3>Amendment Nos.:</T3> 33 and 32.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-80 and DPR-82: </T3>Amendmentschanged the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 28, 1988 (53 FR 47886). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 29, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> California Polytechnic StateUniversity Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San LuisObispo, California 93407.<ITAG tagnum="85">Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company,Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, DocketNos. 50-277 and 50-278, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, Unit Nos. 2and 3, York County, Pennsylvania</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments:</T3> September 7, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendments:</T3> These amendments reflect a modificationto the diesel generator building carbon dioxide fire protection system(CARDOX) correcting design deficiencies by replacing the current CARDOXsystem controls and heat detectors with seismically qualified, safety relatedcomponents.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 28, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 28, 1988.<T3>Amendment Nos.:</T3> 137 and 139.<T3>Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-44 and DPR-56:</T3> Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: October 19, 1988 (53 FR 40994). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 28, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Government Publications Section,State Library of Pennsylvania, Education Building, Commonwealth and WalnutStreets, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17126.<ITAG tagnum="85">Public Service Company of Colorado, Docket No. 50-267, Fort St. VrainNuclear Generating Station, Platteville, Colorado</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> October 13, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> The amendment modified the timeallowed to recalibrate the linear power channels following a power reduction.It also makes a minor editorial correction.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 23, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 23, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 66.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-34. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46154). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 23, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Greeley Public Library, CityComplex Building, Greeley, Colorado.<ITAG tagnum="85">Public Service Company of Colorado, Docket No. 50-267, Fort St. VrainNuclear Generating Station, Platteville, Colorado</ITAG><T3>Date of amendment request:</T3> October 14, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> The amendment required testingof the PCRV overpressure protection system in accordance with the ASMECode, Section XI.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 23, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 23, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 67.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-34. </T3>Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46156). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 23, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Greeley Public Library, CityComplex Building, Greeley, Colorado.<ITAG tagnum="85">Sacramento Municipal Utility District, Docket No. 50-312, Rancho SecoNuclear Generating Station, Sacramento County, California</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment:</T3> September 19, 1988, as supplementedNovember 4, 1988.<T3>Brief description of amendment:</T3> This amendment deletes the requirementto perform local leak rate tests (LLRT) on the decay heat removal and highpressure injection containment penetrations. The amendment also changesthe surveillance period for the remaining LLRT.<T3>Date of issuance:</T3> December 21, 1988.<T3>Effective date:</T3> December 21, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 101.<T3>Facility Operating License No. DPR-54:</T3> Amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register</T4>: November 16, 1988 (53 FR 46159). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 21, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received:</T3> No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location:</T3> Martin Luther King RegionalLibrary, 7340 24th Street Bypass, Sacramento, California 95822.<ITAG tagnum="85">Tennessee Valley Authority, Dockets Nos. 50-259, 50-260 and 50-296,Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1, 2 and 3, Limestone County, Alabama</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendments: </T3>August 3, 1988 (TS 247)<T3>Brief description of amendments: </T3>The proposed amendments wouldmodify Sections 3.11 and 4.11 of the current Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant(BFN) Units 1, 2, and 3 Technical Specifications (TS). This change wouldalign BFN activities to current industry fire protection practices andstandards.The TS are being revised to delete ambiguities and to clarify fire protectionsystems Limiting Conditions for Operation (LCO) and Surveillance Requirements(SR). The LCOs have been added to improve and clarify operability requirements.The SRs are being added to provide clearer and better defined SRs to verifysystem operability.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 27, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 27, 1988, and shall be implemented within60 days.<T3>Amendments Nos.:</T3> 162, 159, 133.<T3>Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-33, DPR-52 and DPR-68: </T3>Amendmentsrevised the Technical Specifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register:</T4> September 21, 1988 (53 FR 36674). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluationdated December 27, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>Athens Public Library, SouthStreet, Athens, Alabama 35611.<ITAG tagnum="85">Toledo Edison Company and the Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company,Docket No. 50-346, Davis-Besse Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 1, OttawaCounty, Ohio</ITAG><T3>Date of application for amendment: </T3>April 22, 1985, supplementedJuly 31, 1986.<T3>Brief description of amendment: </T3>The amendment revised the TechnicalSpecifications to delete the isolation times specified in Table 3.6-2 forcertain containment isolation valves. The amendment also corrected typographicalerrors relating to three valves and deleted redundant listings for twovalves.<T3>Date of issuance: </T3>December 27, 1988.<T3>Effective date: </T3>December 27, 1988.<T3>Amendment No.:</T3> 127.<T3>Facility Operating License No. NPF-3. </T3>Amendments revised the TechnicalSpecifications.<T3>Date of initial notice in </T3><T4>Federal Register:</T4> November 5, 1986 (51 FR 40282). The Commission'srelated evaluation of the amendment is contained in a letter dated December27, 1988.<T3>No significant hazards consideration comments received: </T3>No.<T3>Local Public Document Room location: </T3>University of Toledo Library,Documents Department, 2801 Bancroft Avenue, Toledo, Ohio 43606.<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this 3rd day of January, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Gary M. Holahan,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Acting Director, Division of Reactor Projects III, IV, V and SpecialProjects, Office of Nuclear Reactor Regulation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-442 Filed 1-10-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 7590-01-M </ITAG></TEXT></DOC>